District of Columbia statutes.
8-604

Penalties.

Any person who shall violate or aid or abet in violating any of the provisions of this chapter or of the regulations promulgated by the Council of the District of Columbia under this chapter shall be punished by a fine of not more than $50 or by imprisonment for not exceeding 15 days. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Apr. 22, 1940, 54 Stat. 155, ch. 131, § 5
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 449, 32 DCR 4450

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-604.
1973 Ed., § 6-704.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(143) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.